Washington statutes.
RCW 19.83.040

Coupons or similar devices—Exemptions.

(1) Nothing in this chapter, or in any other statute or ordinance of this state, shall apply to:

(a) The issuance and direct redemption by a manufacturer of a premium coupon, certificate, or similar device; or prevent him or her from issuing and directly redeeming such premium coupon, certificate, or similar device, which, however, shall not be issued, circulated, or distributed by retail vendors except when contained in or attached to an original package;

(b) The publication by, or distribution through, newspapers or other publications of coupons, certificates, or similar devices; or

(c) A coupon, certificate, or similar device which is within, attached to, or a part of a package or container as packaged by the original manufacturer and which is to be redeemed by another manufacturer, if:

(i) The coupon, certificate, or similar device clearly states the names and addresses of both the issuing manufacturer and the redeeming manufacturer; and

(ii) The issuing manufacturer is responsible for redemption of the coupon, certificate, or similar device if the redeeming manufacturer fails to do so.

(2) The term "manufacturer," as used in this section, means any vendor of an article of merchandise which is put up by or for him or her in an original package and which is sold under his, her, or its trade name, brand, or mark.

[ 2011 c 336 s 554; 1983 c 40 s 1; 1972 ex.s. c 104 s 1; 1957 c 221 s 3. Prior: 1939 c 31 s 1, part; 1913 c 134 s 3, part; RRS s 8361, part. Formerly RCW 36.91.040.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 40: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1983 c 40 s 2.]